Washington statutes.
RCW 36.65.050

Fire protection or law enforcement units—Binding arbitration in collective bargaining.

Subject to the requirements of RCW 41.56.100 and 41.58.070, if the city-county government includes a fire protection or law enforcement unit that was, prior to the formation of the city-county, governed by a state statute providing for binding arbitration in collective bargaining, then the entire fire protection or law enforcement unit of the city-county shall be governed by that statute.

[ 2021 c 13 s 5; 1984 c 91 s 5.]